North Carolina statutes. Chapter 8C. Evidence Code.
Article 8. Hearsay.
Rule 803.
Hearsay exceptions; availability of declarant immaterial.

The following are not excluded by the hearsay rule, even though the declarant is available as a witness:

Present Sense Impression. — A statement describing or explaining an event or condition made while the declarant was perceiving the event or condition, or immediately thereafter.

Excited Utterance. — A statement relating to a startling event or condition made while the declarant was under the stress of excitement caused by the event or condition.

Then Existing Mental, Emotional, or Physical Condition. — A statement of the declarant’s then existing state of mind, emotion, sensation, or physical condition (such as intent, plan, motive, design, mental feeling, pain, and bodily health), but not including a statement of memory or belief to prove the fact remembered or believed unless it relates to the execution, revocation, identification, or terms of declarant’s will.

Statements for Purposes of Medical Diagnosis or Treatment. — Statements made for purposes of medical diagnosis or treatment and describing medical history, or past or present symptoms, pain, or sensations, or the inception or general character of the cause or external source thereof insofar as reasonably pertinent to diagnosis or treatment.

Recorded Recollection. — A memorandum or record concerning a matter about which a witness once had knowledge but now has insufficient recollection to enable him to testify fully and accurately, shown to have been made or adopted by the witness when the matter was fresh in his memory and to reflect that knowledge correctly. If admitted, the memorandum or record may be read into evidence but may not itself be received as an exhibit unless offered by an adverse party.

Records of Regularly Conducted Activity. — A memorandum, report, record, or data compilation, in any form, of acts, events, conditions, opinions, or diagnoses, made at or near the time by, or from information transmitted by, a person with knowledge, if (i) kept in the course of a regularly conducted business activity and (ii) it was the regular practice of that business activity to make the memorandum, report, record, or data compilation, all as shown by the testimony of the custodian or other qualified witness, or by affidavit or by document under seal under Rule 902 of the Rules of Evidence made by the custodian or witness, unless the source of information or the method or circumstances of preparation indicate lack of trustworthiness. Authentication of evidence by affidavit shall be confined to the records of nonparties, and the proponent of that evidence shall give advance notice to all other parties of intent to offer the evidence with authentication by affidavit. The term “business” as used in this paragraph includes business, institution, association, profession, occupation, and calling of every kind, whether or not conducted for profit.

Absence of Entry in Records Kept in Accordance with the Provisions of Paragraph (6). — Evidence that a matter is not included in the memoranda, reports, records, or data compilations, in any form, kept in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (6), to prove the nonoccurrence or nonexistence of the matter, if the matter was of a kind of which a memorandum, report, record, or data compilation was regularly made and preserved, unless the sources of information or other circumstances indicate lack of trustworthiness.

Public Records and Reports. — Records, reports, statements, or data compilations, in any form, of public offices or agencies, setting forth (A) the activities of the office or agency, or (B) matters observed pursuant to duty imposed by law as to which matters there was a duty to report, excluding, however, in criminal cases matters observed by police officers and other law-enforcement personnel, or (C) in civil actions and proceedings and against the State in criminal cases, factual findings resulting from an investigation made pursuant to authority granted by law, unless the sources of information or other circumstances indicate lack of trustworthiness.

Records of Vital Statistics. — Records or data compilations, in any form, of births, fetal deaths, deaths, or marriages, if the report thereof was made to a public office pursuant to requirements of law.

Absence of Public Record or Entry. — To prove the absence of a record, report, statement, or data compilation, in any form, or the nonoccurrence or nonexistence of a matter of which a record, report, statement, or data compilation, in any form, was regularly made and preserved by a public office or agency, evidence in the form of a certification in accordance with Rule 902, or testimony, that diligent search failed to disclose the record, report, statement, or data compilation, or entry.

Records of Religious Organizations. — Statements of births, marriages, divorces, deaths, legitimacy, ancestry, relationship by blood or marriage, or other similar facts of personal or family history, contained in a regularly kept record of a religious organization.

Marriage, Baptismal, and Similar Certificates. — Statements of fact contained in a certificate that the maker performed a marriage or other ceremony or administered a sacrament, made by a clergyman, public official, or other person authorized by the rules or practices of a religious organization or by law to perform the act certified, and purporting to have been issued at the time of the act or within a reasonable time thereafter.

Family Records. — Statements of fact concerning personal or family history contained in family Bibles, genealogies, charts, engravings on rings, inscriptions on family portraits, engravings on urns, crypts, or tombstones, or the like.

Records of Documents Affecting an Interest in Property. — The record of a document purporting to establish or affect an interest in property, as proof of the content of the original recorded document and its execution and delivery by each person by whom it purports to have been executed, if the record is a record of a public office and an applicable statute authorizes the recording of documents of that kind in that office.

Statements in Documents Affecting an Interest in Property. — A statement contained in a document purporting to establish or affect an interest in property if the matter stated was relevant to the purpose of the document, unless dealings with the property since the document was made have been inconsistent with the truth of the statement or the purport of the document.

Statements in Ancient Documents. — Statements in a document in existence 20 years or more the authenticity of which is established.

Market Reports, Commercial Publications. — Market quotations, tabulations, lists, directories, or other published compilations, generally used and relied upon by the public or by persons in particular occupations.

Learned Treatises. — To the extent called to the attention of an expert witness upon cross-examination or relied upon by him in direct examination, statements contained in published treatises, periodicals, or pamphlets on a subject of history, medicine, or other science or art, established as a reliable authority by the testimony or admission of the witness or by other expert testimony or by judicial notice. If admitted, the statements may be read into evidence but may not be received as exhibits.

Reputation Concerning Personal or Family History. — Reputation among members of his family by blood, adoption, or marriage, or among his associates, or in the community, concerning a person’s birth, adoption, marriage, divorce, death, legitimacy, relationship by blood, adoption, or marriage, ancestry, or other similar fact of his personal or family history.

Reputation Concerning Boundaries or General History. — Reputation in a community, arising before the controversy, as to boundaries of or customs affecting lands in the community, and reputation as to events of general history important to the community or state or nation in which located.

Reputation as to Character. — Reputation of a person’s character among his associates or in the community.

(Reserved).

Judgment as to Personal, Family or General History, or Boundaries. — Judgments as proof of matters of personal, family or general history, or boundaries, essential to the judgment, if the same would be provable by evidence of reputation.

Other Exceptions. — A statement not specifically covered by any of the foregoing exceptions but having equivalent circumstantial guarantees of trustworthiness, if the court determines that (A) the statement is offered as evidence of a material fact; (B) the statement is more probative on the point for which it is offered than any other evidence which the proponent can procure through reasonable efforts; and (C) the general purposes of these rules and the interests of justice will best be served by admission of the statement into evidence. However, a statement may not be admitted under this exception unless the proponent of it gives written notice stating his intention to offer the statement and the particulars of it, including the name and address of the declarant, to the adverse party sufficiently in advance of offering the statement to provide the adverse party with a fair opportunity to prepare to meet the statement.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1; 2015-247, s. 11(a).

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 803, except as noted below. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The exceptions are phrased in terms of nonapplication of the hearsay rule, rather than in positive terms of admissibility, in order to repel any implication that other possible grounds for exclusion are eliminated from consideration.

The present rule proceeds upon the theory that under appropriate circumstances a hearsay statement may possess circumstantial guarantees of trustworthiness sufficient to justify nonproduction of the declarant in person at the trial even though he may be available. The theory finds vast support in the many exceptions to the hearsay rule developed by the common law in which unavailability of the declarant is not a relevant factor. The present rule is a synthesis of them, with revisions where modern developments and conditions are believed to make that course appropriate.

In a hearsay situation, the declarant is, of course, a witness, and neither this Rule nor Rule 804 dispenses with the requirement of firsthand knowledge. It may appear from his statement or be inferable from circumstances. See Rule 602.”

As the Advisory Committee’s Note indicates, the exceptions are phrased in terms of nonapplication of the hearsay rule. Evidence that is otherwise inadmissible may be stricken from a writing.

Exception (1) concerns present sense impressions and Exception (2) concerns excited utterances. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“In considerable measure these two examples overlap, though based on somewhat different theories. The most significant practical difference will lie in the time lapse allowable between event and statement.

The underlying theory of Exception (1) is that substantial contemporaneity of event and statement negative the likelihood of deliberate or conscious misrepresentation. Moreover, if the witness is the declarant, he may be examined on the statement. If the witness is not the declarant, he may be examined as to the circumstances as an aid in evaluating the statement. (Citation omitted.)

* * * * *

The theory of Exception (2) is simply that circumstances may produce a condition of excitement which temporarily stills the capacity of reflection and produces utterances free of conscious fabrication. 6 Wigmore § 1747, p. 135. Spontaneity is the key factor in each instance, though arrived at by somewhat different routes. Both are needed in order to avoid needless niggling.

With respect to the
time element,
Exception (1) recognizes that in many, if not most, instances precise contemporaneity is not possible, and hence a slight lapse is allowable. Under Exception (2) the standard of measurement is the duration of the state of excitement. ‘How long can excitement prevail? Obviously there are no pat answers and the character of the transaction or event will largely determine the significance of the time factor.’ ”

North Carolina courts have recognized a hearsay exception for spontaneous utterances that is substantially the same as Exception (2). See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 164 (1982). Exception (2) would clarify discordant rulings in this area, particularly as to the element of time.

Id.

at 650. Exception (1) would be a new exception to the hearsay rule in North Carolina.

Id.

at 653.

Exception (3) concerns statements of the declarant’s then existing mental, emotional or physical condition. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The exclusion of ‘statements of memory or belief to prove the fact remembered or believed’ is necessary to avoid the virtual destruction of the hearsay rule which would otherwise result from allowing state of mind, provable by a hearsay statement, to serve as the basis for an inference of the happening of the event which produced the state of mind.”

Exception (3) is similar to the corresponding North Carolina exception to the hearsay rule. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 161 (1982). However, the North Carolina exception differs from Exception (3) in that in North Carolina declarations that are made in a criminal case after the commission of the crime are generally not included within the exception for fear that admissibility would permit the defendant to create evidence for himself.

Id.

at 636.

In North Carolina, when the issue is one of undue influence or fraud with respect to the execution of a will, the declarations of a testator are admitted only as corroborative evidence and are not alone sufficient to establish the previous conduct of another person by means of which the alleged fraud was perpetrated or the undue influence exerted.
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 163, at 647-48. Exception (3) would change this result and permit such declarations to be admitted as substantive proof.

Exception (4) concerns statements made for purposes of medical diagnosis and treatment. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Even those few jurisdictions which have shied away from generally admitting statements of present condition have allowed them if made to a physician for purposes of diagnosis and treatment in view of the patient’s strong motivation to be truthful.* * * The same guarantee of trustworthiness extends to statements of past conditions and medical history, made for purposes of diagnosis or treatment. It also extends to statements as to causation, reasonably pertinent to the same purposes, in accord with the current trend.* * * Statements as to fault would not ordinarily qualify under this latter language. Thus a patient’s statement that he was struck by an automobile would qualify but not his statement that the car was driven through a red light. Under the exception the statement need not have been made to a physician. Statements to hospital attendants, ambulance drivers, or even members of the family might be included.

Under current North Carolina practice, statements of past condition made by a patient to a treating physician or psychiatrist, when relevant to diagnosis or treatment and therefore inherently reliable, are admissible to show the basis for the expert’s opinion.
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 161, at 635 (1982). In some instances, a statement to a nontreating physician is currently admissible.

State

v.

Franks,

300 N.C. 1

(1980). Professor Brandis states that when qualifying as basis for the expert’s opinion statements of past condition “should be (though, as yet, they are not) admissible as substantive evidence as an exception to the hearsay rule.”

Brandis, supra,

at 636.

Exception (5) concerns past recollection recorded, which is currently admissible in North Carolina. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 33 (1982).

The phrase “or adopted by a witness” was added by Congress to make it clear that statements adopted by a witness would come within the rule. The language chosen by Congress may be read to suggest that the statement does not qualify for admission unless the witness made the recordation himself or actually adopted the recordation of another. The exception should be construed so as not to require that the recordation of another be actually adopted by the witness. Thus the statement may be one that was made by the witness, one that was adopted by the witness, or one that was made by the witness and recorded by another. This construction would be in accord with North Carolina practice which permits use of the recorded statement if the witness is able to testify that he saw it at a time when the facts were fresh in his memory, and that it actually represented his recollection at the time. See
Brandis, supra,
at 127.

To prevent a jury from giving too much weight to a written statement that cannot be effectively cross-examined, the last sentence of Exception (5) provides that the memorandum or record may be read into evidence but may not be received as an exhibit unless offered by an adverse party. Current North Carolina practice apparently permits the writing itself, or a reading thereof by the authenticating witness, to be admitted.
Brandis, supra,
at 126, n. 75.

Exception (6) concerns records of regularly conducted activity. The exception is derived from the traditional business records exception. The exception is limited to business records, but business is defined to include the records of institutions and associations like schools, churches and hospitals. This appears to be a slight expansion of the current North Carolina business records exception. See
Brandis, supra
, § 155.

The exception is consistent with North Carolina practice in that the person making the record is not required to have personal knowledge of the transactions entered. See
Brandis, supra
, § 155, at 617. However, it must be shown that the record was actually based (or it was the regular practice of the activity to base the record) upon a person with knowledge acting pursuant to a regularly conducted activity.

The exception specifically includes both diagnoses and opinions, in addition to acts, events and conditions, as proper subjects of admissible entries. See
State
v.

DeGregory,

285 N.C. 122

(1977).

In addition, the Advisory Committee’s Note states that:

* * * * *

“Problems of the motivation of the informant have been a source of difficulty and disagreement.

The formulation of specific terms which would assure satisfactory results in all cases is not possible. Consequently the rule proceeds from the base that records made in the course of a regularly conducted activity will be taken as admissible but subject to authority to exclude if ‘the sources of information or other circumstances indicate lack of trustworthiness.’ ”

Apparently, there are no North Carolina cases on this point.

The rule is in accord with North Carolina practice in that it includes computer storage.
Brandis, supra
, § 155, at 619.

Exception (7) concerns the absence of an entry in the records of regularly conducted activity. As the Advisory Committee’s Note states: “Failure of a record to mention a matter which would ordinarily be mentioned is satisfactory evidence of its nonexistence.” This is existing North Carolina law. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 155 (1982).

Exception (8) differs from Fed. R. Evid. 803(8) in that the word “State” is used in lieu of the word “government”.

Part (A) of the exception is for records, reports, statements or data compilations setting forth the activities of the public office or agency. Part (A) is in accord with North Carolina practice. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 153 (1982).

Part (B) covers matters observed pursuant to duty imposed by law when there is also a duty to report. Part (B) is in general accord with North Carolina practice.
Id.
In criminal cases, Part (B) does not cover matters observed by police officers and other law enforcement personnel. Note that the right to confrontation may exclude evidence in criminal cases even if the matter is not one observed by law enforcement personnel.

Part (C) covers factual findings resulting from an investigation made pursuant to legal authority. The term “factual findings” is not intended to preclude the introduction of evaluative reports containing conclusions or opinions. Apparently North Carolina courts currently exclude statements in reports that only amount to an expression of opinion.
Id.
at 609.

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Factors which may be of assistance in passing upon the admissibility of evaluative reports include: (1) the timeliness of the investigation . . .; (2) the special skill or experience of the official . . .; (3) whether a hearing was held and the level at which conducted; (4) possible motivation problems suggested by Palmer v. Hoffman, 318 U.S. 109 . . . (1943). Others no doubt could be added.

The formulation of an approach which would give appropriate weight to all possible factors in every situation is an obvious impossibility. Hence the rule, as in Exception (6), assumes admissibility in the first instance but with ample provision for escape if sufficient negative factors are present. In one respect, however, the rule with respect to evaluative reports under item (c) is very specific: they are admissible only in civil cases and against the government in criminal cases in view of the almost certain collision with confrontation rights which would result from their use against the accused in a criminal case.”

The phrase “unless the sources of information or other circumstances indicate lack of trustworthiness” applies to all three parts of the exception.

Public records and reports that are not admissible under Exception (8) are not admissible as business records under Exception (6).

Exception (9) excludes from the hearsay ban records of vital statistics and is similar to G.S. 130-49 [now repealed] and G.S. 130-66 [now repealed].

One purpose of the exception is to admit a death certificate to prove that a death occurred. G.S. 130-66 [now repealed] also provides that a death certificate is prima facie evidence of the cause of death. However, in
State
v.

Watson,

281 N.C. 221

(1972), the Court held that the admission of the “hearsay and conclusory statement” of the cause of death in the victim’s death certificate violated the right to confrontation. Exception (9) is not intended to permit the use of statements of the cause of death in a death certificate against a defendant in a criminal case.

Exception (10) concerns the absence of a public record or entry. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The principle of proving nonoccurrence of an event by evidence of the absence of a record which would regularly be made of its occurrence, developed in Exception (7) with respect to regularly conducted activities, is here extended to public records of the kind mentioned in Exceptions (8) and (9). 5 Wigmore § 1633(6), p. 519. Some harmless duplication no doubt exists with Exception (7). * * *

The rule includes situations in which absence of a record may itself be the ultimate focal point of inquiry,
e.g., People
v.

Love,

310 Ill. 558, 142 N.E. 204 (1923), certificate of secretary of state admitted to show failure to file documents required by Securities Law, as well as cases where the absence of a record is offered as proof of the nonoccurrence of an event ordinarily recorded.”

Exception (10) is similar to

G.S. 1A-1

, Civ. Pro. Rules 44(b) and 44(c). See also
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 153, at 610 (1982).

Exception (11) concerns records of religious organizations. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Records of activities of religious organizations are currently recognized as admissible at least to the extent of the business records exception to the hearsay rule, 5 Wigmore § 1523, p. 371, and Exception (6) would be applicable. However, both the business record doctrine and Exception (6) require that the person furnishing the information be one in the business or activity. The result is such decisions as
Daily v. Grand Lodge,
311 Ill. 184, 142 N.E. 478 (1924), holding a church record admissible to prove fact, date, and place of baptism, but not age of child except that he had at least been born at the time. In view of the unlikelihood that false information would be furnished on occasions of this kind, the rule contains no requirement that the information be in the course of the activity.”

Currently in North Carolina records of activities of religious organizations are admissible to the extent of the business records exception to the hearsay rule. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 155 (1982).

Exception (12) concerns marriage, baptismal, and similar certificates. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The principle of proof by certification is recognized as to public officials in Exceptions (8) and (10), and with respect to authentication in Rule 902. The present exception is a duplication to the extent that it deals with a certificate by a public official, as in the case of a judge who performs a marriage ceremony. The area covered by the rule is, however, substantially larger and extends the certification procedure to clergymen and the like who perform marriages and other ceremonies or administer sacraments. Thus certificates of such matters as baptism or confirmation, as well as marriage, are included. In principle they are as acceptable evidence as certificates of public officers. See 5 Wigmore § 1645, as to marriage certificates. When the person executing the certificate is not a public official, the self-authenticating character of documents purporting to emanate from public officials, see Rule 902, is lacking and proof is required that the person was authorized and did make the certificate. The time element, however, may safely be taken as supplied by the certificate, once authority and authenticity are established, particularly in view of the presumption that a document was executed on the date it bears.”

Under current North Carolina practice, these items are admissible only to the extent they are part of a public record.

Exception (13) concerns family records.

The North Carolina exception for family records is more restrictive in that statements of family history and pedigree are admissible only if the declarant (1) is unavailable; (2) made the statement before the beginning of the controversy; and (3) bore a relationship to the family such that he was likely to have known the truth.
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 149 (1982).

Exception (14) concerns records of documents affecting an interest in property. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The recording of title documents is a purely statutory development. Under any theory of the admissibility of public records, the records would be receivable as evidence of the contents of the recorded document, else the recording process would be reduced to a nullity. When, however, the record is offered for the further purpose of proving execution and delivery, a problem of lack of firsthand knowledge by the recorder, not present as to contents, is presented. This problem is solved, seemingly in all jurisdictions, by qualifying for recording only those documents shown by a specified procedure, either acknowledgement or a form of probate, to have been executed and delivered. 5 Wigmore §§ 1647-1651.”

Exception (14) is consistent with North Carolina practice. See

G.S. 47-20

through 47-20.4;

G.S. 47-14

; and

G.S. 47-17

.

Exception (15) concerns statements in documents affecting an interest in property. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Dispositive documents often contain recitals of fact. Thus a deed purporting to have been executed by an attorney in fact may recite the existence of the power of attorney, or a deed may recite that the grantors are all the heirs of the last record owner. Under the rule, these recitals are exempted from the hearsay rule. The circumstances under which dispositive documents are executed and the requirement that the recital be germane to the purpose of the document are believed to be adequate guarantees of trustworthiness, particularly in view of the nonapplicability of the rule if dealings with the property have been inconsistent with the document. The age of the document is of no significance, though in practical application the document will most often be an ancient one.”

The extent to which recitals of fact in a deed or other dispositive documents are admissible in North Carolina is not entirely certain.
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 152 (1982). Adoption to Exception (15) would somewhat expand admissibility and clarify North Carolina law in this area.

Exception (16) concerns statements in ancient documents. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Authenticating a document as ancient, essentially in the pattern of the common law, as provided in Rule 901(b)(8), leaves open as a separate question the admissibility of assertive statements contained therein as against a hearsay objection. 7 Wigmore § 2145a. Wigmore further states that the ancient document technique of authentication is universally conceded to apply to all sorts of documents, including letters, records, contracts, maps, and certificates, in addition to title documents, citing numerous decisions.
Id.
§ 2145. Since most of these items are significant evidentially only insofar as they are assertive, their admission in evidence must be as a hearsay exception. But see 5

id

§ 1573, p. 429, referring to recitals in ancient deeds as a ‘limited’ hearsay exception. The former position is believed to be the correct one in reason and authority. As pointed out in McCormick § 298, danger of mistake is minimized by authentication requirements, and age affords assurance that the writing antedates the present controversy.”

North Carolina courts currently recognize as exceptions to the hearsay rule recitals in deeds more than 30 years old. “The North Carolina cases have involved deeds, but it may be assumed that the rule extends here, as it does elsewhere, to other dispositive instruments such as wills and powers of attorney.”
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 152, at 604 (1982). Exception (16) would expand the North Carolina exception to include statements in many types of documents more than 20 years old.

Exception (17) concerns market reports and commercial publications. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Ample authority at common law supported the admission in evidence of items falling in this category. While Wigmore’s text is narrowly oriented to lists, etc., prepared for the use of a trade or profession, 6 Wigmore § 1702, authorities are cited which include other kinds of publications, for example, newspaper market reports, telephone directories, and city directories.
Id.
§§ 1702-1706. The basis of trustworthiness is general reliance by the public or by a particular segment of it, and the motivation of the compiler to foster reliance by being accurate.”

North Carolina courts have admitted into evidence a variety of published compilations used or relied on by the public or particular professions. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 165 (1982).

Exception (18) concerns learned treatises. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

* * * * *

“The writers have generally favored the admissibility of learned treatises . . ., but the great weight of authority has been that learned treatises are not admissible as substantive evidence though usable in the cross-examination of experts. The foundation of the minority view is that the hearsay objection must be regarded as unimpressive when directed against treatises since a high standard of accuracy is engendered by various factors: the treatise is written primarily and impartially for professionals, subject to scrutiny and exposure for inaccuracy, with the reputation of the writer at stake. * * * Sound as this position may be with respect to trustworthiness, there is, nevertheless, an additional difficulty in the likelihood that the treatise will be misunderstood and misapplied without expert assistance and supervision. This difficulty is recognized in the cases demonstrating unwillingness to sustain findings relative to disability on the basis of judicially noticed medical texts. * * * The rule avoids the danger of misunderstanding and misapplication by limiting the use of treatises as substantive evidence to situations in which an expert is on the stand and available to explain and assist in the application of the treatise if desired. The limitation upon receiving the publication itself physically in evidence, contained in the last sentence, is designed to further this policy.

The rule does not require that the witness rely upon or recognize the treatise as authoritative, thus avoiding the possibility that the expert may at the outset block cross-examination by refusing to concede reliance or authoritativeness.* * * Moreover, the rule avoids the unreality of admitting evidence for the purpose of impeachment only, with an instruction to the jury not to consider it otherwise.”

Exception (18) is substantially the same as

G.S. 8-40.1

[now repealed]. Although [former]

G.S. 8-40.1

was modeled after Exception (18), there has been some doubt whether the statements, once received, are substantive evidence or are merely for impeachment or corroboration.
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 136, at 543 (1982). It is intended that Exception (18) authorize admission of such statements as substantive evidence.

The last sentence of [former]

G.S. 8-40.1

differs from Exception (18) by providing that the statements may not be received as exhibits “unless agreed to by counsel for the parties.” The quoted language was viewed as superfluous since evidence excluded by this rule and other rules may be admitted upon stipulation by counsel for the parties.

Exception (19) concerns matters of personal and family history. The advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Marriage is universally conceded to be a proper subject of proof by evidence of reputation in the community. * * * As to such items as legitimacy, relationship, adoption, birth, and death, the decisions are divided. * * * All seem to be susceptible to being the subject of well founded repute. The ‘world’ in which the reputation may exist may be family, associates, or community. This world has proved capable of expanding with changing times from the single uncomplicated neighborhood, in which all activities take place, to the multiple and unrelated worlds of work, religious affiliation, and social activity, in each of which a reputation may be generated.”

Under current North Carolina law only reputation among family members is admissible concerning matters of family history and pedigree, except for marriage which may be proved by both family and community reputation.
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 149, at 599 (1982). Exception (19) would permit proof by reputation among family and associates, or in the community.

Exception (20) concerns reputation as to land boundaries or general history. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The first portion of Exception (20) is based upon the general admissibility of evidence of reputation as to land boundaries and land customs, expanded in this country to include private as well as public boundaries. McCormick § 299, p. 625. The reputation is required to antedate the controversy, though not to be ancient. The second portion is likewise supported by authority, id., and is designed to facilitate proof of events when judicial notice is not available. The historical character of the subject matter dispenses with any need that the reputation antedate the controversy with respect to which it is offered.”

Exception (20) is in accord with North Carolina practice. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 150 (1982).

Exception (21) concerns reputation as to character. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Exception (21) recognizes the traditional acceptance of reputation evidence as a means of proving human character. McCormick §§ 44, 158. The exception deals only with the hearsay aspect of this kind of evidence. Limitations upon admissibility based on other grounds will be found in Rules 404, relevancy of character evidence generally, and 608, character of witness. The exception is in effect a reiteration, in the context of hearsay, of Rule 405(a).”

Exception (21) is consistent with North Carolina practice.

Exception (22) is reserved for future codification. Fed. R. Evid. 803(22) concerns use of a judgment of previous conviction to prove a fact essential to sustain the judgment. Under current North Carolina practice, the judgment or finding of a court generally cannot be used in another case as evidence of the fact found, except where the principle of
res judicata
is involved.

Brandis on North Carolina Evidence

§ 143 (1982). By not adopting a hearsay exception for judgments of previous conviction, it is intended that North Carolina practice with respect to previous convictions remain the same.

Exception (23) concerns a judgment as proof of matters of personal, family or general history, or boundaries. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“A hearsay exception in this area was originally justified on the ground that verdicts were evidence of reputation. As trial by jury graduated from the category of neighborhood inquests, this theory lost its validity. It was never valid as to chancery decrees. Nevertheless the rule persisted, though the judges and writers shifted ground and began saying that the judgment or decree was as good evidence as reputation. * * * The shift appears to be correct, since the process of inquiry, sifting, and scrutiny which is relied upon to render reputation reliable is present in perhaps greater measure in the process of litigation. While this might suggest a broader area of application, the affinity to reputation is strong, and paragraph (23) goes no further, not even including character.”

A judgment admitted under this exception is some evidence of the matter essential to the judgment, but is not a binding determination of the matter for purposes of the current proceeding.

Generally, a judgment cannot be used under current North Carolina practice to prove a fact essential to the judgment, except where the principle of
res judicata
is involved.

Brandis on North Carolina Evidence

§ 143 (1982).

Exception (24) differs from Fed. R. Evid. 803(24) in that the last sentence of the federal rule does not require written notice. Also, Exception (24) requires the notice to be given sufficiently in advance of offering the statement while Fed. R. Evid. 803(24) requires the notice to be given sufficiently in advance of the trial or hearing.

This exception makes admissible a hearsay statement not specifically covered by any of the previous twenty-three exceptions if the statement has equivalent circumstantial guarantees of trustworthiness and the court makes the determinations required by the rule. This exception does not contemplate an unfettered exercise of judicial discretion, but it does provide for treating new and presently unanticipated situations which demonstrate a trustworthiness within the spirit of the specifically stated exceptions.

Writing for the majority in
State
v.

Vestal,

278 N.C. 561

, 589 (1971), Justice Lake stated that:
